Maryland, session 2026, HB1644.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
17–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Associate real estate broker” means an individual:
(1) who meets the requirements for a real estate broker license under §
17–305 of this title but who applies for and is granted an associate real estate broker license
under §§ 17–307 and 17–309 of this title; and
(2) who, under the associate real estate broker license, may provide real
estate brokerage services on behalf of a licensed real estate broker with whom the associate
real estate broker is affiliated.
(d) “Commission” means the State Real Estate Commission.
(h) “Licensed associate real estate broker” means, unless the context requires
otherwise, an associate real estate broker who is licensed by the Commission to provide
real estate brokerage services on behalf of a licensed real estate broker with whom the
associate real estate broker is affiliated.
(i) “Licensed real estate broker” means, unless the context requires otherwise, a
real estate broker who is licensed by the Commission to provide real estate brokerage
services.
(j) “Licensed real estate salesperson” means, unless the context requires
otherwise, a real estate salesperson who is licensed by the Commission to provide real
estate brokerage services on behalf of a licensed real estate broker with whom the real
estate salesperson is affiliated.

HOUSE BILL 1644 3
(k) “Licensee” means a licensed real estate broker, a licensed associate real estate
broker, or a licensed real estate salesperson.
(K–1) “PROVIDE PROPERTY MANAGEMENT SERVICES” MEANS TO ENGAGE IN
ANY OF THE FOLLOWING ACTIVITIES:
(1) ACTING WITH THE AUTHORITY OF A LANDLORD IN BUSINESS,
LEGAL, FINANCIAL, OR OTHER MATTERS RELATED TO THE MANAGEMENT OR
MAINTENANCE OF THE REAL PROPERTY OF A LANDLORD; OR
(2) NEGOTIATING CONTRACTS OR OTHERWISE COORDINATING OR
ARRANGING FOR SERVICES OR FOR THE PURCHASE OF PROPERTY AND GOODS
RELATED TO THE MANAGEMENT OR MAINTENANCE OF THE REAL PROPERTY OF A
LANDLORD.
(l) “Provide real estate brokerage services” means to engage in any of the
following activities:
(1) for consideration, providing any of the following services for another
person:
(i) selling, buying, exchanging, or leasing any real estate; or
(ii) collecting rent for the use of any real estate;
(2) for consideration, assisting another person to locate or obtain for
purchase or lease any residential real estate;
(3) engaging regularly in a business of dealing in real estate or leases or
options on real estate;
(4) engaging in a business the primary purpose of which is promoting the
sale of real estate through a listing in a publication issued primarily for the promotion of
real estate sales;
(5) engaging in a business that subdivides land that is located in any state
and sells the divided lots; [or]
(6) for consideration, serving as a consultant regarding any activity set
forth in items (1) through (5) of this subsection; OR
(7) FOR CONSIDERATION, PROVIDING PROPERTY MANAGEMENT
SERVICES ON BEHALF OF A LANDLORD FOR A RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY OF THE
LANDLORD THAT HAS AT LEAST FOUR INDIVIDUAL RENTAL DWELLING UNITS.

HOUSE BILL 1644
(n) “Real estate broker” means an individual who provides real estate brokerage
services.
(o) “Real estate salesperson” means an individual who, while affiliated with and
acting on behalf of a real estate broker, provides real estate brokerage services.
17–301.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this title, an individual shall be
licensed by the Commission as a real estate broker before the individual may provide real
estate brokerage services in the State.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this title, an individual shall be
licensed by the Commission as an associate real estate broker or a real estate salesperson
before the individual, while acting on behalf of a real estate broker, may provide real estate
brokerage services in the State.
(b) A license is not required for:
(1) a financial institution, as defined in Title 1 of the Financial Institutions
Article, a subsidiary or affiliate of such a financial institution, or mortgage loan institution
incorporated under the laws of any state or of the United States to manage, lease, or sell
any property that the institution or subsidiary or affiliate of a financial institution acquires
in connection with a mortgage foreclosure or deed or assignment in lieu of foreclosure;
(2) a lawyer authorized to practice law in the State who:
(i) is not engaged regularly in the business of providing real estate
brokerage services;
(ii) does not represent to the public, by use of a sign or advertisement
or otherwise, that the lawyer is in the business of providing real estate brokerage services;
and
(iii) provides real estate brokerage services while representing
another person in the course of the lawyer’s regular practice of law;
(3) a home builder in the rental or initial sale of a home constructed by the
builder;
(4) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 8–222 OF THE REAL PROPERTY
ARTICLE, an agent of a licensed real estate broker or of an owner of real estate while
managing or leasing that real estate for the real estate broker or owner;

HOUSE BILL 1644 5
(5) any person in negotiating the sale, lease, or other transfer of a business
enterprise if the proposed transfer does not include any interest in real property other than
a lease under which the business enterprise operates; or
(6) any person to subdivide and sell unimproved property owned by that
person if the person meets the requirements of § 17–302 of this subtitle.
17–315.
(a) (1) To qualify for renewal of a license under this subtitle, a licensee shall
complete at least 15 clock hours of continuing education instruction, as provided in
subsection (b) of this section, during the preceding 2–year term.
(2) For a licensee who provides real estate brokerage services solely in
connection with nonresidential real estate, of the clock hours required under paragraph (1)
of this subsection, 2 clock hours shall be satisfied by a course regarding the federal
Americans with Disabilities Act.
(3) A licensee holding a license from another state must complete at least
the number of clock hours of continuing education instruction required under paragraph
(1) of this subsection during each 2–year license term and may substitute clock hours of
continuing education instruction earned in another state, if those clock hours:
(i) are approved as real estate continuing education in that state;
and
(ii) meet the distribution requirements of subsection (b)(2) of this
section.
(4) The Commission shall grant the substitution of clock hours in
paragraph (3) of this subsection only if the other state permits the substitution of clock
hours of continuing education instruction approved by the Commission for a licensee of this
State.
(b) (1) The Commission shall approve the form, substance, and, as provided
under paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, subject matter of all continuing education
courses.
(2) For a licensee who has been issued a renewal certificate under § 17–314
of this subtitle, the subject matter approved by the Commission shall:
(i) relate to real estate or to a subject matter intended to assist a
licensee in providing real estate brokerage services to the public in a more efficient and
effective manner, provided that the subject matter is related to:
1. helping the public buy or sell real estate; OR

HOUSE BILL 1644
2. PROVIDING PROPERTY MANAGEMENT SERVICES;
(ii) every 2 years, include at least one 3 clock hour course that
outlines relevant changes that have occurred in federal, State, or local laws and
regulations, court cases and industry trends that have an impact on those laws and
regulations, or any combination of those laws, regulations, court cases, and industry trends;
(iii) every 2 years, include at least one 2 clock hour course that
outlines federal, State, and local fair housing laws and regulations, including fair housing
advertising;
(iv) every 2 years, include at least one 3 clock hour ethics course that
includes a discussion of:
1. the Maryland Code of Ethics;
2. fraudulent real estate practices; and
3. professionalism as it relates to the Maryland Code of
Ethics, including a discussion relating to conflict resolution and a licensee’s duty to respect
the public, peers, and property;
(v) every 2 years, include at least one 3 clock hour course that
includes the principles of real estate brokerage relationships and disclosures; [and]
(vi) every 2 years for the renewal of a real estate broker license and
the renewal of the license of an individual designated as a branch office manager or a team
leader, include at least one 1.5 clock hour course that includes the requirements of broker
supervision; AND
(VII) EVERY 2 YEARS, INCLUDE AT LEAST ONE 2 CLOCK HOUR
COURSE ON PROPERTY MANAGEMENT AND THE REQUIREMENTS AND PROHIBITIONS
UNDER § 17–527.5 OF THIS TITLE IF A LICENSEE PROVIDES PROPERTY
MANAGEMENT SERVICES ON BEHALF OF A LANDLORD FOR A RESIDENTIAL
PROPERTY OF THE LANDLORD THAT HAS AT LEAST FOUR INDIVIDUAL RENTAL
DWELLING UNITS.
(3) For a licensee who was issued an initial real estate salesperson license
under § 17–309 of this subtitle, the subject matter approved by the Commission shall
include:
(i) at least one 3 clock hour course for each of the following topics:
1. outlining contract writing, standard contract provisions,
key regional contract requirements, and standard addenda and contingencies;

HOUSE BILL 1644 7
2. the principles of real estate brokerage relationships and
disclosures;
3. the principles of real estate practice in relation to:
A. advertising requirements for licensees;
B. the handling and disbursement of escrow funds; and
C. common ownership communities; and
4. property management and landlord and tenant laws; and
(ii) at least one 1.5 clock hour course for each of the following topics:
1. professionalism as it relates to the Maryland Code of
Ethics, including a discussion relating to conflict resolution and a licensee’s duty of respect
for the public, peers, and property; and
2. real estate financing.
(4) The requirement of paragraph (2)(iii) of this subsection does not apply
to a licensee who provides real estate brokerage services solely in connection with
nonresidential real estate.
(5) To be acceptable for credit as a continuing education course under this
section, the course shall cover 1 or more topics approved by the Commission.
(c) (1) Continuing education courses may be conducted by:
(i) the Maryland Association of Realtors or its member boards;
(ii) the Real Estate Brokers of Baltimore, Inc.;
(iii) any similar professional association; or
(iv) an educational institution approved by the Commission.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, continuing education
courses shall be taught by a qualified instructor who is experienced in the real estate
industry and selected by the course provider.
(3) The Commission shall adopt regulations that provide for the conduct of
continuing education instruction courses by virtual or remote means.

HOUSE BILL 1644
(4) To verify the identity of an individual enrolled in a continuing education
course, the entity that conducts the continuing education course shall require, as a
condition of participating in the course, that the individual provide:
(i) for an in–person course, a photo identification; and
(ii) for a virtual or other remote course, a signed affidavit attesting
to the identity of the individual.
(d) If feasible, continuing education courses shall be offered at reasonable
intervals in each county and in each major geographic area of the larger counties.
(e) Within 14 days after completion of a continuing education course, the entity
that conducted the course may submit the course completion information directly to the
Commission and the licensee by electronic means.
(f) The Commission may waive the requirements of this section for a licensee if
the licensee shows good cause for being unable to meet the requirements.
(g) The Commission shall require each course provider to pay a continuing
education course application fee set by the Commission.
17–322.
(b) [Subject] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 17–322.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND
SUBJECT to the hearing provisions of § 17–324 of this subtitle, the Commission may deny
a license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, or suspend or revoke a license if the
applicant or licensee:
(1) fraudulently or deceptively obtains or attempts to obtain a license for
the applicant or licensee or for another;
(2) fraudulently or deceptively uses a license;
(3) directly or through another person willfully makes a misrepresentation
or knowingly makes a false promise;
(4) intentionally or negligently fails to disclose to any person with whom
the applicant or licensee deals a material fact that the licensee knows or should know and
that relates to the property with which the licensee or applicant deals;
(5) as an associate real estate broker or a real estate salesperson, provides
or attempts to provide real estate brokerage services on behalf of a real estate broker
without informing in writing any other real estate broker with whom the associate real
estate broker or the real estate salesperson is affiliated;
(6) violates § 17–530.1(a) or (b) of this title;

HOUSE BILL 1644 9
(7) retains or attempts to retain the services of any unlicensed individual
as an associate real estate broker or a real estate salesperson to evade the law prohibiting
payment of a commission to an unlicensed individual;
(8) guarantees or authorizes or allows another person to guarantee future
profits from the resale of real property;
(9) solicits, sells, or offers to sell real property, so as to influence or attempt
to influence a prospective party to the sale of real property, by:
(i) offering a prize or a free lot;
(ii) conducting a lottery or contest; or
(iii) advertising “free appraisals”, unless the advertiser is prepared
to appraise the real estate free of charge for any person, regardless of the purpose for which
the person requests the appraisal;
(10) accepts a listing contract to sell real property that fails to provide a
definite termination date that is effective automatically without notice from the buyer or
the seller;
(11) accepts a listing contract to sell real property that provides for a “net”
return to a seller and leaves the licensee free to sell the real property at any price higher
than the “net” price;
(12) knowingly solicits a party to an exclusive listing contract with another
licensee to terminate that contract and enter a new contract with the licensee making the
solicitation;
(13) solicits a party to a sales contract, lease, or agreement that was
negotiated by another to breach the contract, lease, or agreement for the purpose of
substituting a new contract, lease, or agreement for which the licensee making the
solicitation is either the real estate broker or an associate real estate broker or a real estate
salesperson affiliated with the real estate broker;
(14) for any transaction in which the licensee has served as or on behalf of a
real estate broker, fails to furnish promptly to each party to the transaction a copy of:
(i) the listing contract to sell or rent real property;
(ii) the contract of sale; or
(iii) the lease agreement;

HOUSE BILL 1644
(15) for any transaction in which the licensee has served as or on behalf of a
real estate broker, fails to keep a copy of any executed:
(i) listing contract to sell or rent real property;
(ii) contract of sale; or
(iii) lease agreement;
(16) whether or not acting for monetary gain, knowingly induces or attempts
to induce a person to transfer real estate or discourages or attempts to discourage a person
from buying real estate:
(i) by making representations about the existing or potential
proximity of real property owned or used by individuals of a particular race, color, religion,
sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin; or
(ii) by representing that the existing or potential proximity of real
property owned or used by individuals of a particular race, color, religion, sex, handicap,
familial status, or national origin will or may result in:
1. the lowering of property values;
2. a change in the racial, religious, or ethnic character of the
block, neighborhood, or area;
3. an increase in criminal or antisocial behavior in the area;
or
4. a decline in the quality of the schools serving the area;
(17) uses any of the following material if it includes the name of an
organization or association of which the licensee is not a member:
(i) a contract form for the listing of real property for sale, rent, or
exchange;
(ii) a contract form for the sale, rent, or exchange of real property; or
(iii) any advertising matter;
(18) as a real estate broker, an associate real estate broker, or a real estate
salesperson, advertises the sale or rent of or an offer to buy real property while failing to
disclose in the advertisement the name of the advertiser and the fact that the advertiser is
a real estate broker, an associate real estate broker, or a real estate salesperson;

HOUSE BILL 1644 11
(19) advertises in any misleading or untruthful manner or violates §
17–527.2 of this title;
(20) as a licensed associate real estate broker or a licensed real estate
salesperson, advertises the sale or rent of or an offer to buy real property in the name of
the associate broker or the salesperson while failing to disclose in the advertisement the
name of the real estate broker on behalf of whom the associate broker or the salesperson is
acting;
(21) except as provided under § 17–604 of this title, for real estate brokerage
services provided by an associate real estate broker or a real estate salesperson, accepts a
commission or other valuable consideration from any person other than a real estate broker
with whom the associate broker or the salesperson is affiliated;
(22) fails to account for or to remit promptly any money that comes into the
possession of the licensee but belongs to another person;
(23) pays or receives a rebate, profit, compensation, or commission in
violation of any provision of this title;
(24) under the laws of the United States or of any state, is convicted of:
(i) a felony;
(ii) a misdemeanor that is directly related to the fitness and
qualification of the applicant or licensee to provide real estate brokerage services; or
(iii) a crime that constitutes a violation of any provision of this title;
(25) engages in conduct that demonstrates bad faith, incompetency, or
untrustworthiness or that constitutes dishonest, fraudulent, or improper dealings;
(26) with actual knowledge of the violation, associates with a licensee in a
transaction or practice that violates any provision of this title;
(27) violates § 17–320(c) of this subtitle by failing as a real estate broker to
exercise reasonable and adequate supervision over the provision of real estate brokerage
services by another individual on behalf of the broker;
(28) provides to a party a contract that does not contain a notice of the
buyer’s right of selection, as required by § 17–524 of this title;
(29) requires a buyer to employ a particular title insurance company,
settlement company, escrow company, or title lawyer in violation of § 17–607 of this title;
(30) fails to make the disclosure or provide the consent form required by §
17–530.2 of this title;

HOUSE BILL 1644
(31) violates any provision of Subtitle 5 of this title that relates to trust
money;
(32) violates any other provision of this title;
(33) violates any regulation adopted under this title or any provision of the
code of ethics;
(34) violates § 17–320(d) of this subtitle by failing as a branch office manager
to exercise reasonable and adequate supervision over the provision of real estate brokerage
services by any salesperson or associate broker registered with that office; or
(35) has been disciplined under a real estate licensing law of another
jurisdiction.
17–322.2.
(A) SUBJECT TO THE HEARING PROVISIONS OF § 17–324 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
FOR A VIOLATION OF § 17–527.5 OF THIS TITLE, THE COMMISSION MAY:
(1) IMPOSE A PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 FOR EACH
VIOLATION; AND
(2) PROHIBIT THE LICENSEE FROM PROVIDING PROPERTY
MANAGEMENT SERVICES FOR UP TO 5 YEARS.
(B) FOR A VIOLATION OF § 17–527.5 OF THIS TITLE, THE COMMISSION MAY
NOT:
(1) DENY A LICENSE OR LICENSE RENEWAL TO ANY APPLICANT; OR
(2) SUSPEND OR REVOKE A LICENSE.
17–527.5.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FIT FOR HUMAN HABITATION” MEANS THAT A
RENTAL DWELLING UNIT IS FREE FROM SERIOUS DEFECTS OR CONDITIONS THAT
CONSTITUTE, OR WILL CONSTITUTE IF NOT PROPERLY CORRECTED, A FIRE HAZARD
OR OTHER SERIOUS AND SUBSTANTIAL THREAT TO THE LIFE, HEALTH, OR SAFETY
OF OCCUPANTS OF THE RENTAL DWELLING UNIT.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A LICENSEE WHO PROVIDES PROPERTY
MANAGEMENT SERVICES ON BEHALF OF A LANDLORD FOR RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY

HOUSE BILL 1644 13
OF THE LANDLORD THAT HAS AT LEAST FOUR INDIVIDUAL RENTAL DWELLING
UNITS.
(C) FOR EACH PROPERTY MANAGED BY A LICENSEE, THE LICENSEE SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE COMPLETE AND ACCURATE INFORMATION REQUIRED
UNDER LAW FOR A RESIDENTIAL LEASE OR RENTAL AGREEMENT; AND
(2) MAINTAIN EACH OCCUPIED RENTAL DWELLING UNIT OF
RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY IN A CONDITION THAT COMPLIES WITH THE STANDARDS
ESTABLISHED BY STATE OR LOCAL LAW, INCLUDING BY ENSURING THAT EACH
OCCUPIED RENTAL DWELLING UNIT IS FIT FOR HUMAN HABITATION.
(D) A LICENSEE SHALL CORRECT ANY VIOLATION OF STATE OR LOCAL LAW
RELATING TO THE CONDITION OF AN OCCUPIED RENTAL DWELLING UNIT:
(1) WITHIN THE PERIOD OF TIME SPECIFIED BY THE STATE OR LOCAL
AUTHORITY; OR
(2) IF NO PERIOD IS SPECIFIED, WITHIN A REASONABLE PERIOD OF
TIME.
(E) (1) A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT THAT DETERMINES AN
OCCUPIED RENTAL DWELLING UNIT IS NOT FIT FOR HUMAN HABITATION OR IS
MAINTAINED IN A MANNER THAT VIOLATES STANDARDS ESTABLISHED BY STATE OR
LOCAL LAW SHALL NOTIFY THE COMMISSION WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE
DETERMINATION.
(2) NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE NAME AND CONTACT INFORMATION OF THE OWNER OF
THE RENTAL DWELLING UNIT;
(II) THE ADDRESS OF THE RENTAL DWELLING UNIT;
(III) WHETHER THE RENTAL DWELLING UNIT IS PART OF A
RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY THAT HAS FOUR OR MORE INDIVIDUAL RENTAL DWELLING
UNITS, IF KNOWN;
(IV) THE NAME AND CONTACT INFORMATION OF THE PERSON
PROVIDING PROPERTY MANAGEMENT SERVICES FOR THE RENTAL DWELLING UNIT,
IF APPLICABLE AND KNOWN;

HOUSE BILL 1644
(V) THE BASIS FOR THE DETERMINATION THAT THE OCCUPIED
RENTAL DWELLING UNIT IS NOT FIT FOR HUMAN HABITATION AND, IF APPLICABLE,
ANY VIOLATIONS OF STATE OR LOCAL LAW RELATED TO THE CONDITION, SAFETY,
OR HABITABILITY OF THE PREMISES THAT CONTRIBUTED TO THE DETERMINATION;
(VI) ANY REQUIRED CORRECTIVE ACTIONS; AND
(VII) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE UNIT CONSIDERS
RELEVANT.
(F) ON RECEIPT OF NOTICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS
SECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL DETERMINE:
(1) WHETHER A LICENSEE PROVIDED PROPERTY MANAGEMENT
SERVICES FOR THE OCCUPIED RENTAL DWELLING UNIT THAT WERE THE BASIS FOR
THE FINDING THAT THE OCCUPIED RENTAL DWELLING UNIT WAS IN A CONDITION
NOT FIT FOR HUMAN HABITATION OR MAINTAINED IN A MANNER THAT VIOLATES
STANDARDS ESTABLISHED BY STATE OR LOCAL LAW;
(2) WHETHER THE LICENSEE PROVIDED INADEQUATE PROPERTY
MANAGEMENT SERVICES; AND
(3) WHETHER TO IMPOSE PENALTIES UNDER § 17–322.2 OF THIS
TITLE.
Article – Real Property
8–222.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “COMMISSION” MEANS THE STATE REAL ESTATE
COMMISSION.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A LANDLORD OF RESIDENTIAL
PROPERTY THAT HAS AT LEAST FOUR INDIVIDUAL RENTAL DWELLING UNITS.
(C) A LANDLORD MAY NOT PROCURE OR USE PROPERTY MANAGEMENT
SERVICES FOR A RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY UNLESS THE PROPERTY MANAGER IS
LICENSED BY THE COMMISSION AS A REAL ESTATE BROKER, AN ASSOCIATE REAL
ESTATE BROKER, OR A REAL ESTATE SALESPERSON UNDER TITLE 17 OF THE
BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND PROFESSIONS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.